Utah statutes.
48-2e-201.   Formation of limited partnership -- Certificate of limited partnership.

(1)  To form a limited partnership, a person must deliver a certificate of limited partnership to the division for filing.

(2)  The certificate of limited partnership must state:

(a)  the name of the limited partnership, which must comply with Section 48-2e-108;

(b)  the street and mailing address of the limited partnership's principal office;

(c)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1);

(d)  the name and the street and mailing addresses of each general partner; and

(e)  whether the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

(3)  A certificate of limited partnership may contain statements as to matters other than those required by Subsection (2), but may not vary or otherwise affect the provisions specified in Subsection 48-2e-112(3) in a manner inconsistent with that Subsection (2).

(4)  A limited partnership is formed when:

(a)  the certificate of limited partnership has become effective;

(b)  at least two persons have become partners;

(c)  at least one person has become a general partner; and

(d)  at least one person has become a limited partner.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

